Illinois, session 104th, SB1488.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)7    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 8Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 9provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 10covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 11Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 12health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 13Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 14356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 15356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 16356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 17356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 18356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 19356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 20356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, 356z.77, and 356z.80 21of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits 22must comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 23370c, and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance   SB1488- 2 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1Code. The program of health benefits shall provide the 2coverage required under Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance 3Code and, for the employees of the State Employee Group 4Insurance Program only, the coverage as also provided in 5Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department of Insurance shall 6enforce the requirements of this Section with respect to 7Sections 370c and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance Code; all 8other requirements of this Section shall be enforced by the 9Department of Central Management Services.10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-768, 19eff. 1-1-24; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 20102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 211-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 248-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 25eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 26103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff.   SB1488- 3 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b11-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 3Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 4    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)5    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 6including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 7of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 8coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 9benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 10health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 11under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 12356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 13356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 14356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 15356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 16356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 17356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 18356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 19The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 20356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 21Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 22Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 23provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 24the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII,   SB1488- 4 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 2rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 3every provision of this Section. 4    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 5any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 6with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 7Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 8Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 9whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 11102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 121-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 13eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 14102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 151-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 16eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 187-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 19eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 20revised 11-26-24.) 21    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 22changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 23    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)24    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a   SB1488- 5 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 2self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 3coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 4coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 5covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 6Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 7356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 8356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 9356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 10356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 11356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 12356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 13356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, 14and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 15comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c of the 16Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall 17enforce the requirements of this Section. The requirement that 18health benefits be covered as provided in this is an exclusive 19power and function of the State and is a denial and limitation 20under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois 21Constitution. A home rule municipality to which this Section 22applies must comply with every provision of this Section. 23    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 24any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 25with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 26Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on   SB1488- 6 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 2whatever reason, is unauthorized. 3(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 4102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 51-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 6eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 7102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 81-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 9eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 117-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 12eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 13revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 1510-22.3f as follows: 16    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)17    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 18protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 19post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 20policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 21the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 22356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 23356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 24356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32,   SB1488- 7 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 2356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 3356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 4356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois 5Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with Section 6356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 7comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c of the Illinois 8Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 9requirements of this Section. 10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, 19eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 20102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 211-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 23103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 247-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, 25eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.)   SB1488- 8 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1    Section 22. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 2adding Section 356z.80 as follows: 3    (215 ILCS 5/356z.80 new)4    Sec. 356z.80. Coverage for general anesthesia. 5    (a) A group or individual policy of accident and health 6insurance or a managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 7issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026 shall provide 8coverage for medically necessary general anesthesia, 9regardless of the duration, for any procedure covered by the 10policy. Medical necessity shall be determined by the attending 11anesthesiologist or licensed anesthesia provider.12    (b) An individual or group policy of accident and health 13insurance is prohibited from denying payment or reimbursement 14for anesthesia services solely because the duration of care 15exceeded a preset time limit. 16    Section 25. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 17amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 18    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)19    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)20    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 21    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 22the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 23141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151,   SB1488- 9 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 2155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g.5-1, 3356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 4356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 5356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 356z.18, 6356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 356z.25, 7356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 356z.33, 8356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 356z.40, 9356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 10356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 11356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 12356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.69, 13356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 14356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 15368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 16408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of 17subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 18XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 19Illinois Insurance Code.20    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 21for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 22Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 23are deemed to be "domestic companies":24        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 25    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;26        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this   SB1488- 10 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1    State; or2        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 3    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 4    of this State, except a corporation subject to 5    substantially the same requirements in its state of 6    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 7    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.8    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 9acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 10pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,11        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 12    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 13    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 14    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 15    acquisition of control takes effect;16        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 17    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 18    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 19    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 20    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 21    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 22    other acquisition of control;23        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 24    following information:25            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 26        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance   SB1488- 11 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1        Organization sought to be acquired;2            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 3        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 4        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 5        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 6        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 7        forma financial statements reflecting projected 8        combined operation for a period of 2 years;9            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 10        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 11        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 12        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and13            (D) such other information as the Director shall 14        require.15    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 16Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 17any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 18enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 19maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 20to its health care certificates).21    (e) In considering any management contract or service 22agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 23Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 24specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 25take into account the effect of the management contract or 26service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees   SB1488- 12 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1and the financial condition of the health maintenance 2organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 3into account the effect of the management contract or service 4agreement on competition.5    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 6Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 7Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 8defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 9Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 10group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 11additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:12        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 13    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 14    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 15    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 16    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 17    not be less than one year); and18        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 19    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 20    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 21    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 22    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 23    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 24    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 25    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 26    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be   SB1488- 13 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 2    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 3    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 4    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 5    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 6    plan years.7    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 8statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 9describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 10and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 11the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 12to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 13profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 14unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 15or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 16experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 17the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 18enrollment unit.19    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 20Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 21contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 22refund authorized under this Section.23    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 24if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 25accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 26Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint   SB1488- 14 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 2adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 3(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 4102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 51-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 6eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 7102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 81-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 9eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 116-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 12eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 13103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 141-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 15eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 16103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 171-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 9-26-24.) 18    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)19    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 20    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 21the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 22141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 23152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 24155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g, 25356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2,   SB1488- 15 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 2356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 3356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 4356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 5356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 6356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 7356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 8356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 9356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 10356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 11356z.77, 356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 12368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 13403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) 14of subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 15XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 16Illinois Insurance Code.17    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 18for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 19Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 20are deemed to be "domestic companies":21        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 22    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;23        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 24    State; or25        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 26    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents   SB1488- 16 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1    of this State, except a corporation subject to 2    substantially the same requirements in its state of 3    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 4    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.5    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 6acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 7pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,8        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 9    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 10    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 11    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 12    acquisition of control takes effect;13        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 14    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 15    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 16    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 17    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 18    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 19    other acquisition of control;20        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 21    following information:22            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 23        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 24        Organization sought to be acquired;25            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 26        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and   SB1488- 17 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 2        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 3        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 4        forma financial statements reflecting projected 5        combined operation for a period of 2 years;6            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 7        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 8        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 9        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and10            (D) such other information as the Director shall 11        require.12    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 13Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 14any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 15enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 16maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 17to its health care certificates).18    (e) In considering any management contract or service 19agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 20Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 21specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 22take into account the effect of the management contract or 23service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 24and the financial condition of the health maintenance 25organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 26into account the effect of the management contract or service   SB1488- 18 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1agreement on competition.2    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 3Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 4Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 5defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 6Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 7group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 8additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:9        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 10    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 11    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 12    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 13    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 14    not be less than one year); and15        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 16    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 17    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 18    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 19    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 20    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 21    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 22    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 23    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 24    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 25    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 26    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable   SB1488- 19 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 2    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 3    plan years.4    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 5statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 6describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 7and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 8the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 9to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 10profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 11unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 12or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 13experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 14the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 15enrollment unit.16    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 17Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 18contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 19refund authorized under this Section.20    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 21if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 22accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 23Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 24Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 25adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 26(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21;   SB1488- 20 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 21-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 3eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 4102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 51-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 6eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 7103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 86-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 9eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 10103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 111-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 12eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 13103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 141-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 1511-26-24.) 16    Section 30. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 17amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 18    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)19    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 20health service organizations shall be subject to the 21provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 22141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 23154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 24355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a,   SB1488- 21 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 2356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 3356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 4356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.80, 364.3, 368a, 401, 401.1, 5402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and 6Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, and 7XXVI of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this Section 8shall require a limited health care plan to cover any service 9that is not a limited health service. For purposes of the 10Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 and 11Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 12organizations in the following categories are deemed to be 13domestic companies:14        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or15        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 16    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 17    of this State, except a corporation subject to 18    substantially the same requirements in its state of 19    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 20    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.21(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 22102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-731, eff. 231-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, 24eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 25102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 261-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445,   SB1488- 22 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 2103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 37-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, 4eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 5    Section 35. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 6amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 7    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)8    Sec. 10. Application of Insurance Code provisions. Health 9services plan corporations and all persons interested therein 10or dealing therewith shall be subject to the provisions of 11Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 133, 136, 139, 140, 12143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 354, 355.2, 355.3, 13355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356r, 356t, 14356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 356z.1, 356z.2, 15356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 16356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.18, 17356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 18356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.46, 19356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 20356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 21356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 356z.80, 364.01, 364.3, 22367.2, 368a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, and 412, 23and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 of the Illinois 24Insurance Code.  SB1488- 23 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 2any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 3with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 4Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 5Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 6whatever reason, is unauthorized. 7(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 8102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 910-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-804, 10eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 11102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, eff. 121-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 13eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 14103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 151-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 16eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 17103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 181-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 19    Section 40. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 20changing Section 5-16.8 as follows: 21    (305 ILCS 5/5-16.8)22    Sec. 5-16.8. Required health benefits. The medical 23assistance program shall (i) provide the post-mastectomy care 24benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and   SB1488- 24 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 2under Sections 356g.5, 356q, 356u, 356w, 356x, 356z.6, 3356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.46, 4356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.64, 5and 356z.67, and 356z.71, 356z.75, and 356z.80 of the Illinois 6Insurance Code, (ii) be subject to the provisions of Sections 7356z.19, 356z.44, 356z.49, 364.01, 370c, and 370c.1 of the 8Illinois Insurance Code, and (iii) be subject to the 9provisions of subsection (d-5) of Section 10 of the Network 10Adequacy and Transparency Act.11    The Department, by rule, shall adopt a model similar to 12the requirements of Section 356z.39 of the Illinois Insurance 13Code. 14    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 15rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 16any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 17of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 18with Section 5-5e. 19    To ensure full access to the benefits set forth in this 20Section, on and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall 21ensure that provider and hospital reimbursement for 22post-mastectomy care benefits required under this Section are 23no lower than the Medicare reimbursement rate. 24(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-144, eff. 1-1-22; 25102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-530, eff. 261-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813,   SB1488- 25 -LRB104 09864 SPS 19932 b1eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 2102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 31-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-703, 4eff. 1-1-25; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 5revised 11-26-24.) 6    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 7changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 8that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 9represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 10not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 11made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 12Public Act. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.